Utah statutes.
15-7-6.   Signatures of officers.
(1) Any certificated registered public obligation is valid and binding,
notwithstanding the fact that any authorized officer who signed it ceased to
be an authorized officer before it is issued.
(2)  An authorized officer may adopt as and for the signature of such officer
the signature of a predecessor in office if that predecessor's signature
appears on the certificated registered public obligation. An authorized
officer incurs no liability by adoption of a predecessor's signature that
would not be incurred by such authorized officer if the signature were that of
such authorized officer.
